District of Columbia statutes.
47-2416

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter, and the application of such provisions to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 139, ch. 146, title VI, § 617
Mar. 10, 1982, D.C. Law 4-71, § 2, 28 DCR 5243
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2416.